Hawaii, session 2026, SB2121.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 127A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§127A-    Official announcements; proclamations; emergencies; American Sign Language interpreter; display; requirements; picture-in-picture required.  (a)  Whenever the governor or mayor, as applicable, makes a proclamation pursuant to this chapter, the governor or mayor shall provide an American Sign Language interpreter who is certified by a nationally or state recognized credentialing authority at each live broadcast press conference during the state of emergency. To the greatest extent possible, the governor or mayor shall ensure that the American Sign Language interpreter is physically positioned in a manner so that the interpreter's face, body, arms, and hands are always visible during a television or internet broadcast of the press conference. (b)  A news media outlet that broadcasts or rebroadcasts an official announcement made live by an elected official or head of an emergency agency via television or the Internet shall display the American Sign Language interpreter in an on-screen picture‑in‑picture window for the full duration of the announcement." SECTION 2.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________